Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.07.035

Referendum.

Upon the filing of a referendum petition in the manner provided in RCW 35A.29.170 signed by qualified electors in number equal to not less than ten percent of the votes cast in the last general municipal election, the resolution authorized by RCW 35A.07.030 shall be referred to the voters for approval or rejection at an election as specified in RCW 35A.07.025.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.07.035.]